Indiana, session 2026, HB1216.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 10-17-12-0.7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.61-2023,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.7. The purpose of the fund established in section
8 of this chapter is to provide:
(1) short term financial assistance to families of qualified service
members; and
(2) funding for hyperbaric oxygen treatment for qualified
service members under IC 10-17-16.
SECTION 2. IC 10-17-12-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.42-2020,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) The military family relief fund is established
to provide:
(1) short term assistance with food, housing, utilities, medical
services, basic transportation, child care, education, employment
or workforce, and other essential family support expenses that
have become difficult to afford for qualified service members or
dependents of qualified service members; and
2026 IN 1216—LS 6584/DI 147


(2) funding for hyperbaric oxygen treatment for qualified
service members under IC 10-17-16.
(b) Except as provided in section 9 of this chapter, the department
shall expend the money in the fund exclusively to provide grants for
assistance and funding as described in subsection (a).
(c) The department shall give priority to applications for grants
from the fund for assistance from the fund described in subsection
(a)(1) to qualified service members or dependents of qualified service
members who have never received a grant under this chapter.
(d) Subject to the approval of the budget agency, the commission
shall establish the maximum total dollar amount of grants for
assistance described in subsection (a)(1) that may be expended in a
state fiscal year. Once the maximum total dollar amount of grants that
may be expended in a state fiscal year is reached, no additional grants
may be authorized until the start of the following state fiscal year.
(e) The director shall each year provide a report to the budget
committee concerning the grant program under this chapter.
(f) A qualified service member or the qualified service member's
dependent may be eligible to receive assistance described in
subsection (a)(1) from the fund.
(g) The commission shall administer the fund.
SECTION 3. IC 10-17-12-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.53-2021,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) The commission shall adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 for the provision of grants for short term financial
assistance under this chapter. Subject to subsection (b), the rules
adopted under this section must address the following:
(1) Uniform need determination procedures.
(2) Eligibility criteria, including income eligibility standards,
asset limit eligibility standards, and other standards concerning
when assistance may be provided.
(3) Application procedures.
(4) Selection procedures.
(5) A consideration of the extent to which an individual has used
assistance available from other assistance programs before
assistance may be provided to the individual from the fund.
(6) Other areas in which the commission determines that rules are
necessary to ensure the uniform administration of the grant
program under this chapter.
(b) The following apply to grants awarded under this chapter:
(1) The income eligibility standards must be based on the federal
gross income of the qualified service member and the qualified
2026 IN 1216—LS 6584/DI 147


service member's spouse.
(2) An employee of the department who is otherwise eligible for
a grant from the fund must submit the employee's application
directly to the commission for review. The department shall have
no influence in any part of the employee's application.
(3) Except as provided in IC 10-17-16, the maximum amount a
qualified service member may receive from the fund is two
thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), unless a higher amount
is approved by the commission.
(4) The commission may consider the following in its analysis of
the applicant's request for assistance in excess of two thousand
five hundred dollars ($2,500):
(A) The department's eligibility determination of the applicant.
(B) Facts considered in the department's need determination
review and award under 915 IAC 3-6-3 and 915 IAC 3-6-5.
(C) The circumstances surrounding the applicant's hardship,
if applicable.
(D) Any substantive changes in the applicant's financial
situation after the original application was submitted.
(E) Facts that may have been unknown or unavailable at the
time of the applicant's original application for assistance.
(F) Other compelling circumstances that may justify assistance
in excess of the two thousand five hundred dollar ($2,500)
threshold.
(5) The commission shall approve or deny within sixty (60) days
an application for a grant filed with the commission after June 30,
2019, by an employee of the department. The commission shall
return an incomplete application with a notation as to omissions.
The return of an incomplete application shall be without
prejudice.
SECTION 4. IC 10-17-13.5-4, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The department may make grants to
qualified entities to be used for the purpose of providing services to
veterans or an eligible person, including the following:
(1) Programs focused on eliminating homelessness, preventing
near term homelessness, and providing safe and secure living
conditions.
(2) Assisting veterans or an eligible person in moving from public
housing assistance programs to:
(A) home ownership; or
2026 IN 1216—LS 6584/DI 147


(B) stable, long term rental status.
A grant under this chapter for the purpose specified in clause (B)
may include up to nine (9) months of rental assistance.
(3) Assisting veterans or an eligible person in finding and using
available federal and state resources.
(4) Providing therapeutic services.
(5) Providing job training and job search assistance.
(6) Preventing veteran suicide or suicide of an eligible person.
(b) The department may make grants to the provider chosen by the
Indiana department of health under section 6 of this chapter (before its
expiration) to be used for the purpose of providing assistance to the
provider to provide diagnostic testing and hyperbaric oxygen treatment
to veterans receiving treatment under the pilot program established
under section 6 of this chapter (before its expiration). However, a grant
under this chapter may not be awarded for the purposes specified in
this subsection unless the Indiana department of health has adopted the
rules required by section 6(g) of this chapter (before its expiration). In
addition, a grant may not be awarded for the purposes specified in this
subsection after the expiration of the pilot program established under
section 6 of this chapter (expired June 30, 2025).
SECTION 5. IC 10-17-13.5-7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 7. A provider under section 6 of this chapter, including
a physician who supervises treatment, is immune from civil and
criminal liability for an act or omission relating to the use of hyperbaric
oxygen treatment to treat a veteran under the pilot program, unless the
act or omission constitutes gross negligence or willful or wanton
misconduct.
SECTION 6. IC 10-17-16 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 16. Hyperbaric Oxygen Treatment Program
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "department" refers to the
Indiana department of veterans' affairs.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "hyperbaric oxygen treatment"
means treatment for traumatic brain injury or posttraumatic
stress disorder that is ordered by a health care provider and
delivered in a hyperbaric chamber.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "program" refers to the
hyperbaric oxygen treatment program established under section
5 of this chapter.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "qualified service member" has
the meaning set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5.
2026 IN 1216—LS 6584/DI 147


Sec. 5. (a) The department shall establish and administer a
hyperbaric oxygen treatment program to make grants to each
provider approved by the Indiana department of health to provide
diagnostic testing and hyperbaric oxygen treatment to a qualified
service member.
(b) Subject to section 9 of this chapter, a provider approved by
the Indiana department of health to provide hyperbaric oxygen
treatment must meet the criteria and requirements established by
the Indiana department of health under section 10 of this chapter.
(c) Funding for the program:
(1) shall be provided from the military family relief fund
under IC 10-17-12; and
(2) may not exceed four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000)
each fiscal year.
(d) Subject to available funding, the department shall advertise
the program through all forms of media.
Sec. 6. The Indiana department of health shall issue a request
for proposals within Indiana to offer treatment under the program.
Sec. 7. (a) A qualified service member is eligible to begin
treatment if the service related event that caused the traumatic
brain injury or posttraumatic stress disorder is documented by a
licensed physician.
(b) The department shall maintain a wait list for the program.
A qualified service member who:
(1) applies; and
(2) is eligible;
for the program but is unable to participate in the program due to
insufficient funding shall be placed on the wait list.
Sec. 8. (a) A qualified service member shall not be required to
pay a copayment.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), a qualified service
member may not receive more than forty (40) one (1) hour
hyperbaric oxygen treatment sessions.
(c) A qualified service member may receive additional
hyperbaric oxygen treatment sessions if:
(1) the qualified service member's treating provider submits
a written request for additional treatment to the department
stating that the qualified service member will benefit from the
additional treatment; and
(2) the request described in subdivision (1) is approved by the
department.
A qualified service member may not receive more than forty (40)
2026 IN 1216—LS 6584/DI 147


additional one (1) hour sessions under this subsection.
Sec. 9. (a) A grant under the program may be provided only to
the provider approved by the Indiana department of health to
provide diagnostic testing and hyperbaric oxygen treatment to
qualified service members.
(b) A provider who treats a qualified service member under this
chapter may not bill for the cost of services above a rate that
exceeds the reimbursement rate for the services determined by the
Indiana department of health.
(c) The amount of a grant awarded to a provider under this
chapter must be based on the reimbursement rate determined by
the Indiana department of health under subsection (b).
Sec. 10. The Indiana department of health, after consulting with
the department, shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement
this chapter, including standards for the following:
(1) Determination by a provider that a qualified service
member is eligible for participation in the program.
(2) Determination by the Indiana department of health that a
provider is eligible to participate in the program, including:
(A) a requirement that the provider must maintain
compliance with applicable fire codes, treatment protocols,
and Indiana department of health oversight; and
(B) other facility standards determined by the Indiana
department of health.
(3) Treatment plan requirements, including the following:
(A) A provider's submission to the Indiana department of
health, before providing hyperbaric oxygen treatment to a
qualified service member, of a treatment plan that
includes:
(i) a health care provider's prescription for hyperbaric
oxygen treatment;
(ii) verification by the provider that the qualified service
member is eligible for participation in the program and
voluntarily accepts treatment through the program;
(iii) an estimate of the cost of the qualified service
member's treatment; and
(iv) any other information required by the Indiana
department of health.
(B) A reasonable time frame for:
(i) approval or disapproval by the Indiana department of
health of a treatment plan described in clause (A); and
(ii) notice to the provider of approval or disapproval of
2026 IN 1216—LS 6584/DI 147


the treatment plan.
(C) Contingent on sufficient funding being available,
approval of each treatment plan that meets the
requirements established by the Indiana department of
health under this chapter.
(D) The sources of funding for the estimated treatment cost
for each qualified service member whose treatment plan is
approved under this chapter.
(4) Criteria for approval of payment for treatment that has
been verified by the Indiana department of health to have
been provided under a treatment plan approved under
subdivision (3), including:
(A) whether a drug or device used in the treatment plan
has been approved for any purpose by the federal Food
and Drug Administration; and
(B) verification of the qualified service member receiving
the treatment, as demonstrated through:
(i) billing documentation from the provider of the
hyperbaric oxygen therapy treatments; or
(ii) attendance documentation signed by the provider
and treatment recipient attesting to the receipt of the
prescribed treatments.
(5) Confidentiality of all individually identifiable patient
information of a qualified service member. However, subject
to the requirements of the federal Health Insurance
Portability and Accountability Act and any other applicable
medical record laws, all data and information from which the
identity of an individual qualified service member cannot be
reasonably ascertained must be available to the general
assembly, participating institutional review boards,
participating health care providers, medical researchers, and
other governmental agencies.
Sec. 11. A provider, including a physician who supervises
treatment, is immune from civil and criminal liability for an act or
omission relating to the use of hyperbaric oxygen treatment to
treat a qualified service member under this chapter unless the act
or omission constitutes gross negligence or willful or wanton
misconduct.
Sec. 12. Each provider shall quarterly file a status report
concerning the services provided by the provider under the
program with the following:
(1) The department.
2026 IN 1216—LS 6584/DI 147


(2) The Indiana department of health.
SECTION 7. IC 34-30-2.1-126 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 126. IC 10-17-13.5-7 (Concerning health care providers
that provide hyperbaric oxygen, and physicians who supervise
treatment, under the pilot program).
SECTION 8. IC 34-30-2.1-126.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 126.5. IC 10-17-16-11
(Concerning health care providers that provide hyperbaric oxygen,
and physicians who supervise treatment, under the program).
2026 IN 1216—LS 6584/DI 147